Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-265
Civil procedure statutes; applicability.

Proceedings under section 9-263 shall be subject to and governed by the district court civil procedure statutes. Issues properly raised shall be tried and determined as in other civil actions in equity. All orders, judgments, and decrees may be reviewed as other orders, judgments, and decrees.

Laws 1979, LB 164, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 9-175;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 66.

Appeals, procedure, see section 25-1901 et seq.

Civil procedure statutes, see section 25-101 et seq.